Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1909.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9720.9. Sentencing for offenses involving protection from abuse violations.In addition to any minimum term of imprisonment authorized or established by law, an individual who commits a criminal offense during the performance of a violation of an offense under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6114 (relating to contempt for violation of order or agreement) shall have the criminal offense graded one degree higher up to and including a felony of the third degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 18 (CRIMES AND OFFENSES) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA <--<--123456789101112131415161718 CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN ASSAULT, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR THE OFFENSES OF SIMPLE ASSAULT, OF RECKLESSLY ENDANGERING ANOTHER PERSON, OF TERRORISTIC THREATS, OF HARASSMENT AND OF STALKING; IN KIDNAPPING, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR THE OFFENSES OF UNLAWFUL RESTRAINT, OF FALSE IMPRISONMENT AND OF CRIMINAL COERCION; IN SEXUAL OFFENSES, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR THE OFFENSE OF INDECENT ASSAULT; AND, IN RIOT, DISORDERLY CONDUCT AND RELATED OFFENSES, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR THE OFFENSE OF DISORDERLY CONDUCT.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 2701(B), 2705, 2706(D), 2709(C) AND 2709.1(C)(2) OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 2701. SIMPLE ASSAULT.* * *(B) GRADING.--SIMPLE ASSAULT IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE UNLESS COMMITTED:(1) IN A FIGHT OR SCUFFLE ENTERED INTO BY MUTUAL CONSENT, IN WHICH CASE IT IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE; [OR](2) AGAINST A CHILD UNDER 12 YEARS OF AGE BY A PERSON 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER, IN WHICH CASE IT IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE[.]; OR(3) DURING THE PERFORMANCE OF A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF), IN WHICH CASE IT IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE.§ 2705. RECKLESSLY ENDANGERING ANOTHER PERSON.(A) OFFENSE DEFINED.--A PERSON COMMITS [A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE IF HE] AN OFFENSE IF THE PERSON RECKLESSLY ENGAGES IN CONDUCT WHICH PLACES OR MAY PLACE ANOTHER PERSON IN DANGER OF 20250HB1909PN2595 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031323334 DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY.(B) GRADING.--AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) CONSTITUTES A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE UNLESS COMMITTED DURING THE PERFORMANCE OF A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF), IN WHICH CASE THE OFFENSE CONSTITUTES A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE.§ 2706. TERRORISTIC THREATS.* * *(D) GRADING.--AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) CONSTITUTES A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE UNLESS [THE]:(1) THE THREAT CAUSES THE OCCUPANTS OF THE BUILDING, PLACE OF ASSEMBLY OR FACILITY OF PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION TO BE DIVERTED FROM THEIR NORMAL OR CUSTOMARY OPERATIONS, IN WHICH CASE THE OFFENSE CONSTITUTES A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE.(2) THE COMMUNICATION WAS MADE IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF), IN WHICH CASE THE OFFENSE CONSTITUTES A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE.* * *§ 2709. HARASSMENT.* * *(C) GRADING.--(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3), AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2) OR (3) SHALL CONSTITUTE A SUMMARY OFFENSE.(2) [AN] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4), AN 20250HB1909PN2595 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4), (5), (6) OR (7) OR (A.1) SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE.(3) THE GRADING OF AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2) OR (3) SHALL BE ENHANCED ONE DEGREE IF THE PERSON HAS PREVIOUSLY VIOLATED AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER 23 PA.C.S. § 6108 (RELATING TO RELIEF) INVOLVING THE SAME VICTIM, FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER[.] OR IF THE OFFENSE IS COMMITTED IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9), (9.1) OR (A.1).(4) AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4), (5), (6) OR (7) OR (A.1) SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE IF COMMITTED IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9), (9.1) OR (A.1).* * *§ 2709.1. STALKING.* * *(C) GRADING.--* * *(2) A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION OR A FIRST OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IF COMMITTED IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9), (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF), OR THE PERSON HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY CONVICTED OF A CRIME OF VIOLENCE INVOLVING THE SAME VICTIM, FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, A VIOLATION OF SECTION 2701 (RELATING TO SIMPLE 20250HB1909PN2595 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSAULT), 2702 (RELATING TO AGGRAVATED ASSAULT), 2705 (RELATING TO RECKLESSLY ENDANGERING ANOTHER PERSON), 2718 (RELATING TO STRANGULATION), 2901 (RELATING TO KIDNAPPING), 3121 (RELATING TO RAPE) OR 3123 (RELATING TO INVOLUNTARY DEVIATE SEXUAL INTERCOURSE), AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 [(RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS)] OR AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER 23 PA.C.S. § 6108 [(RELATING TO RELIEF)] SHALL CONSTITUTE A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE.* * *SECTION 2. SECTIONS 2902(A) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND 2903(A) OF TITLE 18 ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTIONS ARE AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:§ 2902. UNLAWFUL RESTRAINT.(A) OFFENSE DEFINED.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) [OR], (C) OR (C.1), A PERSON COMMITS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE IF HE KNOWINGLY:* * *(C.1) UNLAWFUL RESTRAINT IN VIOLATION OF PROTECTIVE ORDER.--AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL CONSTITUTE A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE IF COMMITTED IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9), (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF).* * *§ 2903. FALSE IMPRISONMENT.(A) OFFENSE DEFINED.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) [OR], (C) OR (C.1), A PERSON COMMITS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE IF [HE] THE PERSON KNOWINGLY RESTRAINS ANOTHER UNLAWFULLY SO AS TO INTERFERE SUBSTANTIALLY WITH HIS LIBERTY.* * *20250HB1909PN2595 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C.1) FALSE IMPRISONMENT IN VIOLATION OF PROTECTIVE ORDER.--AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE IF THE OFFENSE IS COMMITTED IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9), (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF).* * *SECTION 3. SECTIONS 2906(C), 3126(B) AND 5503(B) OF TITLE 18 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 2906. CRIMINAL COERCION.* * *(C) GRADING.--CRIMINAL COERCION IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE UNLESS THE THREAT IS TO COMMIT A FELONY OR THE INTENT OF THE ACTOR IS FELONIOUS OR THE THREAT WAS MADE IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF), IN WHICH CASES THE OFFENSE IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE.§ 3126. INDECENT ASSAULT.* * *(B) GRADING.--INDECENT ASSAULT SHALL BE GRADED AS FOLLOWS:(1) AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OR (8) IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE[.], UNLESS THE OFFENSE IS COMMITTED DURING THE PERFORMANCE OF A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF), IN WHICH CASE THE OFFENSE IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE 20250HB1909PN2595 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FIRST DEGREE.(2) AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2), (3), (4), (5) OR (6) IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE[.], UNLESS THE OFFENSE IS COMMITTED DURING THE PERFORMANCE OF A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1), IN WHICH CASE THE OFFENSE IS A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE.(3) AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(7) IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE UNLESS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY, IN WHICH CASE IT IS A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE:(I) IT IS A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE.(II) THERE HAS BEEN A COURSE OF CONDUCT OF INDECENT ASSAULT BY THE PERSON.(III) THE INDECENT ASSAULT WAS COMMITTED BY TOUCHING THE COMPLAINANT'S SEXUAL OR INTIMATE PARTS WITH SEXUAL OR INTIMATE PARTS OF THE PERSON.(IV) THE INDECENT ASSAULT IS COMMITTED BY TOUCHING THE PERSON'S SEXUAL OR INTIMATE PARTS WITH THE COMPLAINANT'S SEXUAL OR INTIMATE PARTS.(V) THE OFFENSE IS COMMITTED DURING THE PERFORMANCE OF A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1).§ 5503. DISORDERLY CONDUCT.* * *(B) GRADING.--(1) AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE IF THE INTENT OF THE ACTOR IS TO CAUSE 20250HB1909PN2595 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBSTANTIAL HARM OR SERIOUS INCONVENIENCE, OR IF HE PERSISTS IN DISORDERLY CONDUCT AFTER REASONABLE WARNING OR REQUEST TO DESIST. OTHERWISE DISORDERLY CONDUCT IS A SUMMARY OFFENSE.(2) AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE IF THE OFFENSE IS COMMITTED DURING THE PERFORMANCE OF A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SECTION 4954 (RELATING TO PROTECTIVE ORDERS) OR A PROVISION OF AN ORDER CONSISTENT WITH 23 PA.C.S. § 6108(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9) OR (9.1) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO RELIEF).* * *SECTION 4. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB1909PN2595 - 8 - 1234567891011